California statutes. Business and Professions Code
In addition to other proceedings provided for in this chapter, whenever any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices that constitute, or will constitute, an offense against this chapter, the superior court in and for the county wherein the acts or practices take place, or are about to take place, may issue an injunction, or other appropriate order, restraining that conduct on application of the board, the Attorney General, the district attorney of the county, or on application of 10 or more persons holding licenses issued under this chapter.

The proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3131 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3095.

In accordance with Section 125.9, the board may establish a system for the issuance of citations, and the assessment of administrative fines, as deemed appropriate by the board.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3135 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3096.

(a) A licensee may be ordered to undergo a professional competency examination if, after investigation and review by the Board of Optometry, there is reasonable cause to believe that the licensee is unable to practice optometry with reasonable skill and safety to patients. Reasonable cause shall be demonstrated by one or more of the following:

(1) A single incident of gross negligence.

(2) A pattern of inappropriate prescribing.

(3) An act of incompetence or negligence causing death or serious bodily injury.

(4) A pattern of substandard care.

(b) The results of a competency examination shall be admissible as direct evidence and may be considered relevant in any subsequent disciplinary or interim proceeding against the licensee taking the examination, and, assuming those results are determined to be relevant, shall be considered together with other relevant evidence in making a final determination.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3090.1 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3097.

The sending of a solicitor from house to house or the soliciting from house to house by the holder of an optometrist license constitutes a cause to revoke or suspend his or her license.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3096 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3098.

When the holder uses the title of “Doctor” or “Dr.” as a prefix to his or her name, without using the word “optometrist” as a suffix to his or her name or in connection with it, or, without holding a diploma from an accredited school of optometry, the letters “Opt. D.” or “O.D.” as a suffix to his or her name, it constitutes a cause to revoke or suspend his or her optometrist license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 12.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3099.

No optometrist shall advertise or otherwise hold himself or herself out to be a specialist in eye disease and the treatment thereof.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3096.5 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3100.

The holding out as having a special knowledge of optometry, as defined in this chapter, by the holder of a license, constitutes a cause to revoke or suspend his or her license.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3099 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3101.

It is unlawful to advertise by displaying a sign or otherwise or hold himself or herself out to be an optometrist without having at the time of so doing a valid unrevoked license from the board.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3128 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3102.

It is unlawful to advertise as being free or without cost the furnishing of optometric services where these services are contingent upon payment or other exchange of consideration for goods or other services offered by the provider, unless that contingency is fully disclosed in the same advertisement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 302, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3103.

It is unlawful to include in any advertisement relating to the sale or disposition of goggles, sunglasses, colored glasses, or occupational eye-protective devices, any words or figures that advertise or have a tendency to advertise the practice of optometry.

This section does not prohibit the advertising of the practice of optometry by a licensed optometrist in the manner permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 13.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3104.

The employing of what are known as “cappers” or “steerers” to obtain business constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3100 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3105.

Altering or modifying the medical record of any person, with fraudulent intent, or creating any false medical record, with fraudulent intent, constitutes unprofessional conduct. In addition to any other disciplinary action, the California State Board of Optometry may impose a civil penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 86.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3106.

Knowingly making or signing any license, certificate, or other document directly or indirectly related to the practice of optometry that falsely represents the existence or nonexistence of a state of facts constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 14.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3107.

It is unlawful to use or attempt to use any license or certificate issued by the board that has been purchased, fraudulently issued, counterfeited, or issued by mistake, as a valid license or certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 15.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3108.

When the holder is suffering from a contagious or infectious disease, it constitutes a cause to suspend his or her license during the period of continuance of that disease.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3097 by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3109.

Directly or indirectly accepting employment to practice optometry from any person not having a valid, unrevoked license as an optometrist or from any company or corporation constitutes unprofessional conduct. Except as provided in this chapter, no optometrist may, singly or jointly with others, be incorporated or become incorporated when the purpose or a purpose of the corporation is to practice optometry or to conduct the practice of optometry.

The terms “accepting employment to practice optometry” as used in this section shall not be construed so as to prevent a licensed optometrist from practicing optometry upon an individual patient.

Notwithstanding the provisions of
 this section or the provisions of any other law, a licensed optometrist may be employed to
 practice optometry by a physician and surgeon who holds a license under this division
 or by a health care service plan pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 87.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3110.

The board may take action against any licensee who is charged with unprofessional conduct, and may deny an application for a license if the applicant has committed unprofessional conduct. In addition to other provisions of this article, unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate any provision of this chapter or any of the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Gross negligence.

(c) Repeated negligent
 acts. To be repeated, there must be two or more negligent acts or omissions.

(d) Incompetence.

(e) The commission of fraud, misrepresentation, or any act involving dishonesty or corruption, that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of an optometrist.

(f) Any action or conduct that would have warranted the denial of a license.

(g) The use of advertising relating to optometry that violates Section 651 or 17500.

(h) Denial of licensure, revocation, suspension, restriction, or any other disciplinary action against a health care professional license by another state or
 territory of the United States, by any other governmental agency, or by another California health care professional licensing board. A certified copy of the decision or judgment shall be conclusive evidence of that action.

(i) Procuring his or her license by fraud, misrepresentation, or mistake.

(j) Making or giving any false statement or information in connection with the application for issuance of a license.

(k) Conviction of a felony or of any offense substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of an optometrist, in which event the record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(l) Administering to himself or herself
 any controlled substance or using any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or using alcoholic beverages to the extent, or in a manner, as to be dangerous or injurious to the person applying for a license or holding a license under this chapter, or to any other person, or to the public, or, to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the person applying for or holding a license to conduct with safety to the public the practice authorized by the license, or the conviction of a misdemeanor or felony involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to in this subdivision, or any combination thereof.

(m) (1) Committing or soliciting an act punishable as a sexually related crime, if that act or solicitation is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or
 duties of an optometrist.

(2) Committing any act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient. The commission of and conviction for any act of sexual abuse, sexual misconduct, or attempted sexual misconduct, whether or not with a patient, shall be considered a crime
 substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee. This paragraph shall not apply to sexual contact between any person licensed under this chapter and his or her spouse or person in an equivalent domestic relationship when that licensee provides optometry treatment to his or her spouse or person in an equivalent domestic relationship.

(3) Conviction of a crime that requires the person to register as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code. A conviction within the meaning of this paragraph means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. A conviction described in this paragraph shall be considered a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee.

(n) Repeated acts of excessive prescribing, furnishing, or
 administering of controlled substances or dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or repeated acts of excessive treatment.

(o) Repeated acts of excessive use of diagnostic or therapeutic procedures, or repeated acts of excessive use of diagnostic or treatment facilities.

(p) The prescribing, furnishing, or administering of controlled substances or drugs specified in Section 4022, or treatment without a good faith prior examination of the patient and optometric reason.

(q) The failure to maintain adequate and accurate records relating to the provision of services to his or her patients.

(r) Performing, or holding oneself out as being able to
 perform, or offering to perform, any professional services beyond the scope of the license authorized by this chapter.

(s) The practice of optometry without a valid, unrevoked, unexpired license.

(t) The employing, directly or indirectly, of any suspended or unlicensed optometrist to perform any work for which an optometry license is required.

(u) Permitting another person to use the licensee’s optometry license for any purpose.

(v) Altering with fraudulent intent a license issued by the board, or using a fraudulently altered license, permit certification or any registration issued by the board.

(w) Except for good cause, the knowing failure to protect patients by failing to follow infection control guidelines of the board, thereby risking transmission of bloodborne infectious diseases from optometrist to patient, from patient to patient, or from patient to optometrist. In administering this subdivision, the board shall consider the standards, regulations, and guidelines of the State Department of Public Health developed pursuant to Section 1250.11 of the Health and Safety Code and the standards, guidelines, and regulations pursuant to the California Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1973 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 5 of the Labor Code) for preventing the transmission of HIV, hepatitis B, and other bloodborne pathogens in health care settings. As necessary, the board may consult with the Medical Board of California, the California Board of Podiatric Medicine,
 the Board of Registered Nursing, and the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, to encourage appropriate consistency in the implementation of this subdivision.

(x) Failure or refusal to comply with a request for the clinical records of a patient, that is accompanied by that patient’s written authorization for release of records to the board, within 15 days of receiving the request and authorization, unless the licensee is unable to provide the documents within this time period for good cause.

(y) Failure to refer a patient to an appropriate physician and surgeon if an examination of the eyes indicates a substantial likelihood of any pathology that requires the attention of that physician and
 surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 549, Sec. 8.   (AB 443)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3111.

It is unprofessional conduct and a violation of this chapter for a person licensed under this chapter to violate, attempt to violate, assist in the violation of, or conspire to violate the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this article, or any regulation adopted pursuant to those provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3112.

(a) An optometrist shall not knowingly provide optometric services to any patient who scheduled their appointment for optometry services through any individual, corporation, or firm engaged in the business of filling prescriptions that is not properly registered with the California State Board of Optometry as required by Section 2564.90.

(b) An optometrist shall not knowingly enter into a lease or other written agreement giving rise to a direct or indirect landlord-tenant relationship with any individual, corporation, or firm engaged in the business of filling prescriptions that is not properly registered with the California State Board of Optometry as required
 by Section 2564.90.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 88.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Offenses Against the Chapter [3120. - 3137.]

3120.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not less than ten days nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand five hundred dollars, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 423.)
-------------------------------------------

3137.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code for the violation of any provision of this chapter shall be filed within three years after the board discovers the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, or within seven years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action occurs, whichever occurs first.

(b) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging fraud or willful misrepresentation is not subject to the limitation in subdivision (a).

(c) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging unprofessional conduct based on incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts of the licensee is not subject to the limitation in subdivision (a) upon proof that the licensee intentionally concealed from discovery his or her incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts.

 (d) If an alleged act or omission involves any conduct described in Section 726 committed on a minor, the 10-year limitations period in subdivision (e) shall be tolled until the minor reaches the age of majority.

(e) An accusation filed against a licensee pursuant to Section 11503 of the Government Code alleging conduct described in Section 726 shall be filed within three years after the board discovers the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action, or within 10 years after the act or omission alleged as the ground for disciplinary action occurs, whichever occurs first. This subdivision shall apply to a complaint alleging conduct received by the board on and after January 1, 2006.

(f) In any allegation, accusation, or proceeding described in this section, the limitations period in subdivision (a) shall be tolled for the period during which material evidence necessary for prosecuting or determining whether a disciplinary action would be appropriate is unavailable to the board due to an ongoing criminal investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Revenue [3145. - 3152.5.]

3145.

There is the Optometry Fund in the State Treasury. Unless otherwise provided, all money collected under the authority of this chapter shall be paid into this fund, and shall be available, upon appropriation of the Legislature, to carry out the purposes of this chapter. Pursuant to Section 128.5, the board shall not maintain a reserve balance in the fund that is greater than 24 months of the appropriated operating expenses of the board in any fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 29.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3145.5.

Administrative fines collected pursuant to Section 3095 shall be deposited in the Optometry Fund. It is the legislative intent that moneys collected as fines and deposited in the fund be used by the board primarily for enforcement purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3146.

An optometric license issued under this chapter expires at midnight on the last day of the month in which the license was issued during the second year of a two-year term if not renewed. To renew an unexpired license, the optometrist shall apply for renewal on a form prescribed by the board and pay the renewal fee prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 25.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3147.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by Section 114, an expired optometrist license may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration, and a retired license issued for less than three years may be reactivated to active status, by filing an application for renewal or reactivation on a form prescribed by the board, paying all accrued and unpaid renewal fees or reactivation fees determined by the board, paying any delinquency fees prescribed by the board, and submitting proof of completion of the required number of hours of continuing education for the last two years, as prescribed by the board pursuant to Section 3059. Renewal or reactivation to active status under this section shall be effective on the date on which all of those requirements are satisfied. If so renewed or reactivated to active status, the license
 shall continue as provided in Sections 3146 and 3147.5.

(b) Expired statements of licensure, branch office licenses, and fictitious name permits issued pursuant to Sections 3070, 3077, and 3078, respectively, may be renewed at any time by filing an application for renewal, paying all accrued and unpaid renewal fees, and paying any delinquency fees prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 18.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3147.5.

A license that has been suspended is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but renewal does not entitle the holder of a suspended license to engage in the practice of optometry, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

A license that has been revoked is subject to expiration, but it may not be renewed. If a revoked license is reinstated after it has expired, a reinstatement fee of 150 percent of the renewal fee shall be assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3147.6.

Except as otherwise provided by Section 114, a license that is not renewed within three years after its expiration may be restored, and a retired license issued for more than three years may be reactivated to active status, if no fact, circumstance, or condition exists that, if the license were restored, would justify its revocation or suspension, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The holder of the expired license or retired license is not subject to denial of a license under Section 480.

(b) The holder of the expired license or retired license applies in writing for its restoration or reactivation on a form prescribed by the board.

(c) The holder of the expired license or retired license pays the fee or fees as would be required of him or her if he or she were then applying for a license for the first time.

(d) The holder of the expired license or retired license satisfactorily passes both of the following examinations:

(1) The National Board of Examiners in Optometry’s Clinical Skills examination or other clinical examination approved by the board.

(2) The board’s jurisprudence examination.

(e) After taking and satisfactorily passing the examinations identified in subdivision (d), the holder of the expired license or retired license pays a restoration fee equal to the sum of the license renewal fee in effect on the
 last regular renewal date for licenses or a reactivation fee determined by the board, and any delinquency fees prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 359, Sec. 4.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3147.7.

The provisions of Section 3147.6 shall not apply to a person holding a license that has not been renewed within three years of expiration, if the person provides satisfactory proof that he or she holds an active license from another state and meets all of the following conditions:

(a) Is not subject to denial of a license under Section 480.

(b) Applies in writing for restoration of the license on a form prescribed by the board.

(c) Pays all accrued and unpaid renewal fees and any delinquency fees prescribed by the board.

(d) Submits proof of completion of the required number of hours of continuing education for the last two years.

(e) Takes and satisfactorily passes the board’s jurisprudence examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 653, Sec. 17.   (SB 1489)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

3148.

From each fee for the renewal of a license for the biennial renewal of a license, there shall be paid the sum of sixteen dollars ($16) by the Director of Consumer Affairs to the University of California.

This sum shall be used at and by the University of California solely for the advancement of optometrical research and the maintenance and support of the department at the university in which the science of optometry is taught.

The balance of each renewal fee shall be paid into the Optometry Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3150.

The department may make all necessary disbursements to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3151.

(a) The board shall issue, upon application and payment of the fee described in Section 3152, a retired license to an optometrist who holds a license that is current.

(b) A licensee who has been issued a retired license is exempt from continuing education requirements pursuant to Section 3059. The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(c) The holder of a retired license shall not engage in the practice of optometry.

(d) An optometrist holding a retired license shall only be permitted to use the titles “retired optometrist” or
 “optometrist, retired.”

(e) The holder of a retired license issued for less than three years may reactivate the license to active status if the holder meets the requirements of Section 3147.

(f) The holder of a retired license issued for more than three years may reactivate the license to active status if the holder satisfies the requirements in Section 3147.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 30.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3151.1.

(a) The board shall issue, upon application and payment of the fee described in Section 3152, a license with retired volunteer service designation to an optometrist who satisfies any of the following:

(1) The applicant holds any of the following:

(A) A retired license issued within the last three years.

(B) A license that has not been renewed and has expired within the last three years.

(C) A license that is current and active.

(2) The applicant holds either of the following, and the applicant certifies on the application that he or she has completed an additional 50 hours of formal continuing optometric education coursework:

(A) A retired license issued more than three, but less than five, years ago.

(B) A license that has not been renewed and has expired more than three, but less than five, years ago.

(3) The applicant holds either of the following, and satisfies the requirements set forth in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 3147.6:

(A) A retired license issued more than five years ago.

(B) A license that has not been renewed and has expired more than five years ago.

(b) The board shall not issue a license pursuant to this section to an applicant whose application would be subject to denial pursuant to Section 480.

(c) The applicant shall certify on the application that the sole purpose of the license with retired volunteer service designation is to provide voluntary, unpaid optometric services at health fairs, vision screenings, and public service eye programs.

(d) The holder of the retired license with volunteer service designation shall submit a biennial renewal application, with a fee fixed by this chapter and certify on each renewal that the required number
 of continuing education hours pursuant to Section 3059 were completed, and certify that the sole purpose of the retired license with volunteer service designation is to provide voluntary, unpaid services as described in subdivision (c). Pursuant to Section 3146, the license expires at midnight on the last day of the licenseholder’s birth month every two years if not renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   (AB 1253)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3152.

The amounts of fees and penalties prescribed by this chapter shall be established by the board in amounts not greater than those specified in the following schedule:

(a) The fee for applicants applying for a license shall not exceed two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275).

(b) The fee for renewal of an optometric license shall be a minimum of five hundred dollars
 ($500) and shall not exceed seven hundred dollars ($700).

(c) The fee for issuance of a license or upon change of name authorized by law of a person holding a license under this chapter shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(d) The delinquency fee for renewal of an optometric license shall be a minimum of fifty dollars ($50) and shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75).

(e) The application fee for a certificate to perform lacrimal irrigation and dilation shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(f) The application fee for a certificate to treat glaucoma shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(g) The fee for approval of a continuing education course shall not exceed one hundred dollars
 ($100).

(h) The fee for issuance of a statement of licensure shall not exceed forty dollars ($40).

(i) The fee for biennial renewal of a statement of licensure shall not exceed forty dollars ($40).

(j) The delinquency fee for renewal of a statement of licensure shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20).

(k) The application fee for a fictitious name permit shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(l) The renewal fee for a fictitious name permit shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(m) The delinquency fee for renewal of a fictitious name permit shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(n) The fee for a retired license shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(o) The fee for a retired license with volunteer designation shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(p) The biennial renewal fee for a retired license with volunteer designation shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(q) The application fee for a certificate to administer immunizations shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(r) The application fee for a home residence permit is fifty dollars ($50). The board may increase the fee to not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(s) The renewal fee for a home residence permit is fifty
 dollars ($50). The board may increase the fee to not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(t) The delinquency fee for a home residence permit is twenty-five dollars ($25). The board may increase the fee to not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(u) The endorsement fee is forty dollars ($40). The board may increase the fee, as
 necessary to cover the reasonable regulatory costs of administration, to not more than sixty dollars ($60).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 788, Sec. 31.   (SB 776)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3152.5.

The board may require each applicant for a certificate to use therapeutic pharmaceutical agents, pursuant to Section 3041.3, to pay an application fee, and may require each licenseholder to pay a renewal fee. The application fee and the renewal fee shall not exceed the actual costs to the board of the reviewing and processing of the application for a license or renewal of a license, monitoring the practice by licenseholders, and enforcing the provisions of law governing the use of therapeutic pharmaceutical agents, the diagnosis and treatment of certain conditions, and the performance of certain procedures by persons certified to use therapeutic pharmaceutical agents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 393, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Optometric Corporations [3160. - 3167.]

3160.

An optometric corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as described in Sections 13401 and 13401.5 of the Corporations Code, if that corporation and its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are physicians and surgeons, psychologists, registered nurses, optometrists, or podiatrists are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act as contained in Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, the provisions of this article, and all other statutes and regulations now or hereafter enacted or adopted pertaining to the corporation and the conduct of its affairs. With respect to an
 optometric corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the California State Board of Optometry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 630, Sec. 90.   (AB 1534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3163.

Except as provided in Section 3078, the name of an optometric corporation and any name or names under which it may be rendering professional services shall contain and be restricted to the name or the last name of one or more of the present, prospective, or former shareholders and shall include the words optometric corporation or wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence, provided that the articles of incorporation shall be amended to delete the name of a former shareholder from the name of the corporation within two years from the date the former shareholder dies or otherwise ceases to be a shareholder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 17.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3164.

Except as provided in Sections 13401.5 and 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of an optometric corporation shall be a licensed person as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 621, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

3165.

The income of an optometric corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder for his shares in the optometric corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1265.)
-------------------------------------------

3166.

An optometric corporation shall not do or fail to do an act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule, or regulation. In conducting its practice, an optometric corporation shall observe and be bound by statutes, rules, and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under Section 3055.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 564, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

3167.

The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including rules and regulations requiring (a) that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of an optometric corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of such corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act), or a deceased person shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of such corporation within such time as such rules and regulations may provide; and (b) that an optometric corporation as a condition of obtaining a certificate pursuant to the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act and this article shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1265.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.7. Physician Assistants [3500. - 3545.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [3500. - 3503.5.]

3500.

In its concern with the growing shortage and geographic maldistribution of health care services in California, the Legislature intends to establish in this chapter a framework for another category of health manpower—the physician assistant.

The purpose of this chapter is to encourage the effective utilization of the skills of physicians and surgeons, and physicians and surgeons and podiatrists practicing in the same medical group practice, by enabling them to work with qualified physician assistants to provide quality care.

This chapter is established to encourage the coordinated care between physician assistants, physicians and surgeons, podiatrists, and
 other qualified health care providers practicing in the same medical group, and to provide health care services. It is also the purpose of this chapter to allow for innovative development of programs for the education, training, and utilization of physician assistants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3500.5.

This chapter shall be known and cited as the Physician Assistant Practice Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1104, Sec. 1.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3501.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the Physician Assistant Board.

(b) “Approved program” means a program for the education of physician assistants that has been formally approved by the board.

(c) “Trainee” means a person who is currently enrolled in an approved program.

(d) “Physician assistant” or “PA” means a person who meets the requirements of this chapter and is licensed by the board.

(e) “Supervising physician” or “supervising physician and surgeon”
 means a physician and surgeon licensed by the Medical Board of California or by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California who supervises one or more physician assistants, who possesses a current valid license to practice medicine, and who is not currently on disciplinary probation prohibiting the employment or supervision of a physician assistant.

(f) (1) “Supervision” means that a licensed physician and surgeon oversees the activities of, and accepts responsibility for, the medical services rendered by a physician assistant. Supervision, as defined in this subdivision, shall not be construed to require the physical presence of the physician and surgeon, but does require the following:

(A) Adherence to adequate supervision as agreed to in the practice
 agreement.
